Maryland, session 2026, HB1476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) “Eligible customer–generator” means a customer that owns and
operates, leases and operates, or contracts with a third party that owns and operates a
biomass, micro combined heat and power, solar, fuel cell, wind, or closed conduit hydro
electric generating facility that:
(i) is located on the customer’s premises or contiguous property;
(ii) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric
company’s transmission and distribution facilities; and
(iii) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the customer’s own
electricity requirements.
(7) “Net energy metering” means measurement of the difference between
the electricity that is supplied by an electric company and the electricity that is generated
by an eligible customer–generator and fed back to the electric grid over the eligible
customer–generator’s billing period.
(d) The Commission shall require electric utilities to develop a standard contract
or tariff for net energy metering and make it available to eligible customer–generators on
a first–come, first–served basis until:
(1) the rated generating capacity owned and operated by eligible
customer–generators in the State reaches 3,000 megawatts; OR
(2) THE COMMISSION IMPLEMENTS A SUCCESSOR PROGRAM UNDER §
7–306.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–306.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1476 3
(3) “NET ENERGY METERING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–306
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT, AS A SUCCESSOR
PROGRAM TO THE NET ENERGY METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A NET ENERGY METERING PROGRAM THAT:
(1) INCENTIVIZES THE DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION;
(2) MINIMIZES RATEPAYER COSTS IN THE SHORT TERM AND IN THE
LONG TERM; AND
(3) BALANCES, ON A STATEWIDE BASIS AND ACROSS TECHNOLOGIES
AND INDUSTRY SECTORS PARTICIPATING IN NET ENERGY METERING:
(I) FAIR COMPENSATION FOR ENERGY EXPORTS; AND
(II) THE BENEFITS OF AN ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER GENERATOR’S
OR FACILITY’S REDUCED LOAD ON THE ELECTRIC GRID AGAINST:
1. THE NEEDS OF THE GRID;
2. RATEPAYER COSTS AND BENEFITS; AND
3. IMPLICATIONS OF THE REDUCED LOAD ON ENERGY
EQUITY, INCLUDING ANY DISPARITIES IN THE AMOUNT PAID FOR GRID
MAINTENANCE BY ELIGIBLE CUSTOMER–GENERATORS AND DISTRIBUTED
GENERATION OWNERS IN COMPARISON TO OTHER RETAIL CUSTOMERS.
(C) THE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE AVAILABLE UNTIL THE COMBINED
TOTAL RATED GENERATING CAPACITY OWNED AND OPERATED UNDER THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE NET
ENERGY METERING PROGRAM IMPLEMENTED UNDER THIS SECTION REACHES 6,000
MEGAWATTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible customer–generator” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the
Public Utilities Article.

HOUSE BILL 1476
(3) “Net energy metering” has the meaning stated in § 7–306 of the Public
Utilities Article.
(b) (1) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a proceeding exploring
the development and implementation of a successor program to the net energy metering
program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article.
(2) In conducting the proceeding, the Public Service Commission shall
accept input from utility companies, renewable energy industry experts, consumer
advocates, and other stakeholders.
(c) On or before December 15, 2026, the Public Service Commission shall submit
a report on the proceeding held under subsection (b) of this section to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(d) The report shall include:
(1) recommendations for a successor program to the net energy metering
program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article that:
(i) incentivizes the development of distributed generation;
(ii) minimizes ratepayer costs in the short term and in the long term;
and
(iii) balances, on a statewide basis and across technologies and
industry sectors participating in net energy metering:
1. fair compensation for energy exports;
2. the benefits of an eligible customer–generator’s or
facility’s reduced load on the electric grid against:
A. the needs of the grid;
B. ratepayer costs and benefits; and
C. implications of the reduced load on energy equity,
including any disparities in the amount paid for grid maintenance by eligible
customer–generator and distributed generation owners in comparison to other retail
customers;
(2) recommendations for any legislative changes necessary to implement
the successor program; and
(3) descriptions of how existing eligible customer–generators would be
treated under the successor program, including:

HOUSE BILL 1476 5
(i) community solar projects and subscribers under § 7–306.2 of the
Public Utilities Article; and
(ii) aggregated net energy metering projects and customers under §
7–306.3 of the Public Utilities Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect contingent on the earlier of the date that:
(1) the Public Service Commission submits to the Governor and the
General Assembly the report required under Section 2 of this Act that includes
recommendations for the implementation of a successor program to the net energy metering
program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article; or
(2) total rated generating capacity owned and operated in the State under
the existing net energy metering program under § 7–306 of the Public Utilities Article
reaches 3,000 megawatts.
(b) Within 5 days after the contingency in subsection (a) of this section is met, the
Public Service Commission shall submit written notice to the Department of Legislative
Services.
(c) If written notice that the contingency has been met is received by the
Department of Legislative Services on or before October 1, 2031, Section 1 of this Act shall
take effect on the date the written notice is received by the Department of Legislative
Services.
(d) If written notice that the contingency has been met is not received by the
Department of Legislative Services on or before October 1, 2031, Section 1 of this Act, with
no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided by Section
3 of this Act, this Act is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by
three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly,
and shall take effect from the date it is enacted.